Illinois, session 104th, HB4660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 11-1511.5 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-1511.5 new)7    Sec. 11-1511.5. Operation of bicycle approaching a stop 8sign. 9    (a) As used in this Section, "immediate hazard" means a 10vehicle approaching an intersection at a proximity and rate of 11speed sufficient to indicate to a reasonable person that there 12is a danger of collision or accident.13    (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), an individual 14operating a bicycle approaching a stop sign may proceed 15through the intersection without stopping at the stop sign if:16        (1) the individual slows to a reasonable speed; and17        (2) the individual yields the right-of-way to:18            (A) any pedestrian within the intersection or an 19        adjacent crosswalk;20            (B) other traffic within the intersection; and21            (C) oncoming traffic that poses an immediate 22        hazard during the time the individual is traveling 23        through the intersection.  HB4660- 2 -LRB104 17624 LNS 31055 b1    (c) Subsection (b) does not apply to an intersection with 2an active railroad grade crossing.3    (d) This Section does not apply to individuals under 18 4years of age solely operating a bicycle.5    (e) This Section does not apply to an individual operating 6a bicycle:7        (1) when exiting an alleyway; or8        (2) at a 4-way intersection with only 2 stop signs 9    present.